Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.230

Controversion—Costs and attorney's fees.

Where the answer is controverted, the costs of the proceeding, including a reasonable compensation for attorney's fees, shall be awarded to the prevailing party: PROVIDED, That no costs or attorney's fees in such contest shall be taxable to the defendant in the event of a controversion by the plaintiff.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1023; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 29. Formerly RCW 7.33.290.]